Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1897.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution of Pennsylvania is proposed in accordance with Article XI:That section 2 of Article II be amended to read:§ 2. Election of members; vacancies.(a) Members of the General Assembly shall be chosen at the general election every second year. Their term of service shall begin on the first day of December next after their election. Whenever a vacancy shall occur in either House, the presiding officer thereof shall issue a writ of election to fill such vacancy for the remainder of the term.(b) At the beginning of each term, each member of the General Assembly shall provide the Chief Clerk of their respective House with a list of three individuals who may be 123456789101112131415161718 appointed to fill a vacancy resulting from the death of the member. If a vacancy occurs due to the death of a member, the presiding officer of the House in which that member served shall appoint one of the individuals from the list provided by the member who shall fill the vacancy until an individual is selected through a special election to fill the office for the remainder of the term. Each individual listed by the member or appointed under this section shall be qualified and eligible to serve as a member of the General Assembly pursuant to this article.Section 2. The following procedure applies to the proposed constitutional amendment in this joint resolution:(1) Upon the first passage by the General Assembly of the amendment, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall proceed immediately to comply with the advertising requirements of section 1 of Article XI of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) Upon the second passage by the General Assembly of the amendment, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall proceed immediately to comply with the advertising requirements of section 1 of Article XI of the Constitution of Pennsylvania. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall submit the amendment to the qualified electors of this Commonwealth at the first general or municipal election which meets the requirements of section 1 of Article XI of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.20250HB1897PN2367 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526